Maine, session 132, LD1148.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §780, first ¶, as amended by PL 2013, c. 131, §24, is further
amended to read:
A uniformed service voter or an overseas voter may request an absentee ballot as
provided in section 753‑A or by submitting a federal application or form requesting an
absentee ballot as provided in section 783. With respect to any election for federal office,
a clerk or the Secretary of State may not refuse to accept or process any otherwise valid
voter registration application or absentee ballot application submitted by a uniformed
service voter or an overseas voter on the grounds that the voter submitted the application
more than 3 months before the election for which the application will be used. An
application or request for an absentee ballot for a uniformed service voter or overseas voter
that is accepted pursuant to section 753‑A or section 783 remains valid for 18 months from
the date of receipt of the application and entitles the voter to receive absentee ballots for all
federal and state elections during that period and for any municipal election for which the
uniformed service voter or overseas voter is eligible that is to be held on the same date as
a statewide election.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §783, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 563, §9, is amended
to read:
4. Electronic transmission of absentee ballots. Authorizing the electronic
transmission of absentee ballots to uniformed service voters or overseas voters; and
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §783, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2015, c. 350, §1, is further
amended to read:
5. Electronic receipt of absentee ballots. Authorizing the electronic receipt of voted
absentee ballots from uniformed service voters or overseas voters by a method authorized
by the Secretary of State.; and
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §783, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Central receipt and issuance of local absentee ballots. Receiving from a
municipality holding a municipal election on the same date as a statewide election a copy
of that municipality's local absentee ballot at a central location for the purpose of issuing
that local absentee ballot to a uniformed service voter or overseas voter who is eligible to
receive that local absentee ballot in order to ensure expedited delivery of local absentee
ballots.
Sec. 5. 21-A MRSA §783, 2nd ¶, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 563, §9, is amended
to read:
The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to administer the central issuance and
processing of absentee ballots, including rules that provide for the examination, counting
and storage of ballots in the same manner as regular absentee ballots. The Secretary of
State shall also adopt rules to administer the issuance of a local absentee ballot from a
municipality holding an election on the same date as a statewide election to a uniformed
service voter or overseas voter, including rules related to the receipt of a local absentee
ballot from a uniformed service voter or overseas voter and for the delivery of the local
absentee ballot to the uniformed service voter's or overseas voter's municipality by the close
Page 1 - 132LR0834(01)

413 of the polls on election day. Rules adopted in accordance with this section are routine
424 technical rules as described by Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §2529, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Municipal election on same date as statewide election. If a municipal election is
to be held on the same date as a statewide election, the clerk shall submit to the Secretary
of State or designated vendor a copy of the local ballot as soon as the ballot is ready to be
issued.